Hawaii, session 2025, SB1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 245-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Every wholesaler or dealer, in addition to any other taxes provided by law, shall pay, for the privilege of conducting business and other activities in the State, an excise tax equal to: [(1)  5.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer after June 30, 1998, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (2)  6.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer after September 30, 2002, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (3)  6.50 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer after June 30, 2003, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (4)  7.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer after June 30, 2004, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (5)  8.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after September 30, 2006, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (6)  9.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after September 30, 2007, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (7)  10.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after September 30, 2008, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (8)  13.00 cents for each cigarette sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after July 1, 2009, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (9)  11.00 cents for each little cigar sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after October 1, 2009, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (10)  15.00 cents for each cigarette or little cigar sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after July 1, 2010, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (11)] (1)  16.00 cents for each cigarette or little cigar sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after July 1, 2011, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; (2)  21.00 cents for each cigarette or little cigar sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after January 1, 2026, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; [(12)] (3) Seventy per cent of the wholesale price of each article or item of tobacco products, other than large cigars, electronic smoking devices, and e-liquids, sold by the wholesaler or dealer on and after September 30, 2009, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; [(13)] (4) Fifty per cent of the wholesale price of each large cigar of any length sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after September 30, 2009, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer; and [(14)] (5) Seventy per cent of the wholesale price of each electronic smoking device or e-liquid sold, used, or possessed by a wholesaler or dealer on and after January 1, 2024, whether or not sold at wholesale, or if not sold, then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler or dealer. Where the tax imposed has been paid on cigarettes, little cigars, or tobacco products that thereafter become the subject of a casualty loss deduction allowable under chapter 235, the tax paid shall be refunded or credited to the account of the wholesaler or dealer.  The tax shall be applied to cigarettes through the use of stamps." SECTION 2. Section 245-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§245-15  Disposition of revenues.  All moneys collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury as state realizations to be kept and accounted for as provided by law; provided that, of the moneys collected [under the tax imposed pursuant to:] each fiscal year: [(1)  Section 245-3(a)(5), after September 30, 2006, and prior to October 1, 2007, 1.0 cent per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (2)  Section 245-3(a)(6), after September 30, 2007, and prior to October 1, 2008: (A)  1.5 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (B)  0.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; and (C)  0.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234; (3)  Section 245-3(a)(7), after September 30, 2008, and prior to July 1, 2009: (A)  2.0 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (B)  0.5 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; (C)  0.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the community health centers special fund established pursuant to section 321-1.65; and (D)  0.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234; (4)  Section 245-3(a)(8), after June 30, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2013: (A)  2.0 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (B)  0.75 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; (C)  0.75 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the community health centers special fund established pursuant to section 321-1.65; and (D)  0.5 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234; (5)  Section 245-3(a)(11), after June 30, 2013, and prior to July 1, 2015: (A)  2.0 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (B)  1.5 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; (C)  1.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the community health centers special fund established pursuant to section 321-1.65; and (D)  1.25 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234; and (6)  Section 245-3(a)(11), after June 30, 2015, and thereafter: (A)  2.0 cents per cigarette shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (B)  1.125 cents per cigarette, but not more than $7,400,000 in a fiscal year, shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; (C)  1.25 cents per cigarette, but not more than $8,800,000 in a fiscal year, shall be deposited to the credit of the community health centers special fund established pursuant to section 321-1.65; and (D)  1.25 cents per cigarette, but not more than $8,800,000 in a fiscal year, shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234.] (1)  Beginning July 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent or $14,080,000, whichever is less, shall be deposited to the credit of the Hawaii cancer research special fund, established pursuant to section 304A-2168, for research and operating expenses and for capital expenditures; (2)  Beginning July 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent or $7,400,000, whichever is less, shall be deposited to the credit of the trauma system special fund established pursuant to section 321-22.5; (3)  Beginning July 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent or $8,800,000, whichever is less, shall be deposited to the credit of the community health centers special fund established pursuant to section 321-1.65; and (4)  Beginning July 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent or $8,800,000, whichever is less, shall be deposited to the credit of the emergency medical services special fund established pursuant to section 321-234. The department shall provide an annual accounting of these dispositions to the legislature." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST